Washington statutes.
RCW 17.34.060

Agency incurring expenses to be credited with payments to this state.

The department, agency, or officer expending or becoming liable for an expenditure on account of a control or eradication program undertaken or intensified pursuant to the compact shall have credited to his or her account in the state treasury the amount or amounts of any payments made to this state to defray the cost of such program, or any part thereof, or as reimbursement thereof.

[ 2011 c 336 s 473; 1969 ex.s. c 130 s 6.]